South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3565.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 12-36-2120 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (85) breast pumps, breast pump collection and storage supplies, and breast pump kits. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor and first applies after 2024. ----XX----